Maine, session 132, LD211.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6310 is enacted to read:
§6310. Seizure disorder; training, medication and action plan; education
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Seizure action plan" means a written, individualized health plan designed to
acknowledge and prepare for the health care needs of a student diagnosed with a seizure
disorder.
B. "Seizure rescue medication or medication prescribed to treat seizure disorder
symptoms" means a seizure rescue medication or medication prescribed to treat seizure
disorder symptoms that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
2. Seizure disorder training required. Beginning July 1, 2026, a school
administrative unit and an approved private school shall employ at least one individual who
has completed the training requirements necessary to administer or assist with the
self-administration of a seizure rescue medication or medication prescribed to treat seizure
disorder symptoms. The training must:
A. Include instruction on recognition of and appropriate response to the signs and
symptoms of a seizure; and
B. Conform to training programs and guidelines developed by a national epilepsy
advocacy organization.
Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and annually thereafter, school employees subject
to professional development shall, for a minimum of one hour of self-directed study, review
materials related to seizure disorders.
3. Seizure medication. A school employee who has completed the training under
subsection 2 may administer to a student or assist with a student's self-administration of a
seizure rescue medication or medication prescribed to treat seizure disorder symptoms as
long as the student's parent or guardian has provided:
A. Written authorization for the medication to be administered at school by a school
employee or self-administered by the student with a school employee's assistance;
B. A written statement from a physician licensed in this State containing the name of
the student; the name of the medication; the purpose of the medication; the prescribed
dosage of the medication; the method of administration of the medication; and the
frequency and circumstances under which the medication may be administered; and
C. The prescribed medication in its unopened, sealed package with the label affixed by
the dispensing pharmacy intact.
A written authorization for a seizure rescue medication or medication prescribed to treat
seizure disorder symptoms must be renewed each school year after establishing a seizure
action plan pursuant to subsection 4.
4. Seizure action plan. A school administrative unit and an approved private school
shall collaborate with the parent or guardian of a student diagnosed with a seizure disorder
Page 1 - 132LR0015(01)

412 to establish a seizure action plan. A seizure action plan must be kept on file in the office
423 of the school nurse or a school administrator and be distributed to a school employee
434 responsible for the supervision or care of the student.
5. Education. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, a school administrative unit
and approved private school shall provide age-appropriate seizure education programming
to all students on seizures and seizure disorders. The seizure education program must be
consistent with guidelines published by a national epilepsy advocacy organization.
6. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.